Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
CHAPTER 411 Rights of Action and Survival of Actions

411.010.
Action for assault — Battery — Provocation as a defense or in mitigation of punitive damages.

In any civil action for damages inflicted by an assault or by an assault and battery, the defendant may plead as a defense to the claim for punitive damages, and introduce in evidence in mitigation of punitive damages, any matter of provocation that preceded the assault or battery, if the provocation prompted the assault or battery and was of a nature to cause a person of ordinary prudence and judgment to take the action taken by the defendant.

History.

73a-1.

411.020.
Battery with certain weapons — Punitive damages.

Any person struck by another with any of the weapons popularly known as colts, brass knuckles, slung shots or sandbags, or any imitation or substitute therefor, may recover for the injury done. The jury may also award punitive damages.

History.

3.

411.025.
Action against terrorist for injury to person or property — Damages.

As used in this section:

“Act of terror” means an activity that:

Involves violent acts or acts dangerous to human life that violate federal or state law;

Appears to be intended to:

Intimidate or coerce a civilian population;

Influence the policy of a government by intimidation or coercion; or

Affect the conduct of a government by mass destruction, assassination, or kidnapping; and

Occurs primarily within the Commonwealth; and

“Terrorist” means a person who commits an act of terror, including a person who acts as an accessory before or after the fact, aids or abets, solicits, or conspires to commit an act of terror or who lends material support to an act of terror.

Any person whose property or person is injured by a terrorist may file a claim for and recover damages from the terrorist.

Any person who files an action under this section is entitled to recover three (3) times the actual damages sustained or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever is greater, as well as court costs and attorney’s fees in the trial and appellate courts if the person prevails in the claim.

A civil action brought under this section is remedial and does not limit any other civil or criminal action provided by law. Civil remedies provided under this section are supplemental and not exclusive.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2018). 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 111, sec. 3 provided that this statute as created in Section 1 of that Act shall be known and may be cited as Andy’s Law.

411.030.
Action for seduction — Proof.

An action for seduction may be maintained without any allegation or proof of the loss of service of the victim by reason of the wrongful act of the defendant.

History.

2: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 105.

411.040.
Accusation of incest, fornication or adultery — Proof of damage.

An accusation of incest, fornication or adultery against any person shall be actionable. In such a case the plaintiff shall not be required to allege or prove special damage.

History.

1: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 104.

411.045.
Defenses allowed in action for libel or slander.

In the actions for libel or slander, the defendant may state the truth of the alleged libel or slander, and any mitigating circumstances; and, whether he prove the justification or not, he may prove the mitigating circumstances to reduce the amount of damages.

History.

C.C. 124: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

411.050.
Action for libel; retraction of statement; effect. [Repealed.]

411.051.
Libel actions against newspaper, magazine, or periodical — Demand for and publication of correction — Effect.

In any action for damages for the publication of a defamatory statement in a newspaper, magazine, or periodical, the defendant shall be liable for actual damages sustained by plaintiff. The defendant may plead the publication of a correction in mitigation of damages. Punitive damages may be recovered only if the plaintiff shall allege and prove publication with legal malice and that the newspaper, magazine, or periodical failed to make conspicuous and timely publication of a correction after receiving a sufficient demand for correction.

A “sufficient demand for correction” is a demand for correction which is in writing; which is signed by the plaintiff or his duly-authorized attorney or agent; which specifies the statement or statements claimed to be false and defamatory, states wherein they are false, and sets forth the facts; and which is delivered to the defendant prior to the commencement of the action.

A “correction” is either:

The publication of an acknowledgment that the statement or statements specified as false and defamatory in the plaintiff’s demand for correction are erroneous; or

The publication, in a fair and impartial manner as a matter of law, of the plaintiff’s statement of the facts (as set forth in his demand for correction) or a fair summary thereof, exclusive of any portions thereof which are defamatory of another, obscene, or otherwise improper for publication.

If the demand for correction has specified two (2) or more statements as false and defamatory, the correction may deal with some of such statements pursuant to (a) above and with other of such statements pursuant to (b) above.

A “conspicuous publication” in a newspaper is a publication which is printed in substantially as conspicuous a manner as the statement or statements specified as false and defamatory in the demand for correction.

A “timely publication” in a daily newspaper is a publication within ten (10) business days after the day on which a sufficient demand for correction is received by the defendant. A “timely publication” in a newspaper, magazine, or periodical other than a daily newspaper is a publication in or prior to the next regular issue which is published not less than ten (10) business days after the day on which a sufficient demand for correction is received by the defendant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 66, § 1; 1996, ch. 202, § 3, effective July 15, 1996.

411.060.
Action for libel — Privileged communications.

The publication of a fair and impartial report of any proceeding before any state or city legislative or executive body, board or officer, or the whole or a fair synopsis of any bill, report, resolution, bulletin, notice, petition, or other document presented, filed, or used in any proceeding before any state or city legislative or executive body, board or officer, shall be privileged, unless it is proved that the publication was maliciously made. The publication of a fair and impartial report or the whole or a synopsis of any indictment, warrant, affidavit, pleading or other document in any criminal or civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction shall be privileged, unless it is proved that it was published maliciously, or that the defendant after request by the plaintiff has failed to publish a reasonable explanation or contradiction thereof, giving the explanation or contradiction the same prominence and space as the original publication, or that the publisher has refused after request by the plaintiff to publish the subsequent determination of the proceeding. This section shall not authorize the publication of any indecent matter.

History.

2438b-2.

411.061.
Actions against a radio or television broadcasting station for damages for publication of a defamatory statement — Definitions.

In any action against a radio or television broadcasting station for damages for the publication of a defamatory statement by a visual or sound radio broadcast, the plaintiff shall recover no more than special damages unless he shall allege and prove that he made a sufficient demand for correction and that the radio or television broadcasting station failed to make conspicuous and timely publication of said correction.

A “sufficient demand for correction” is a demand for correction which is in writing; which is signed by the plaintiff or his duly authorized attorney or agent; which specifies the statement or statements claimed to be false and defamatory, states wherein they are false, and sets forth the true facts; and which is delivered to the defendant prior to the commencement of the action.

A “correction” is either (a) the publication of an acknowledgment that the statement or statements specified as false and defamatory in the plaintiff’s demand for correction are erroneous, or (b) the publication of the plaintiff’s statement of the true facts (as set forth in his demand for correction) or a fair summary thereof, exclusive of any portions thereof which are defamatory of another, obscene, or otherwise improper for publication. If the demand for correction has specified two (2) or more statements as false and defamatory, the correction may deal with some of such statements pursuant to (a) above and with other of such statements pursuant to (b) above.

A “conspicuous publication” in a visual or sound radio broadcast is a publication which is broadcast at substantially the same time of day, and with the same sending power, as the statement or statements specified as false and defamatory in the demand for correction. A publication in a particular manner which is agreeable to the plaintiff shall in any event be deemed “conspicuous.”

A “timely publication” in a visual or sound radio broadcast is a publication within one (1) business day after the day on which a sufficient demand for correction is received by the defendant. A “business day” is any day other than a Sunday or legal holiday. A publication on a particular day which is agreeable to the plaintiff shall in any event be deemed “timely.”

“Special damages” are pecuniary damages which the plaintiff alleges and proves that he has suffered in respect to his property, business, trade, profession, or occupation (including such amounts of money as the plaintiff alleges and proves he has expended as a proximate result of the alleged defamation), and no other.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 43, § 1(1), effective May 18, 1956.

411.062.
Defense to actions for damages for publication of a defamatory statement against a radio or television broadcasting station.

If in any action for damages for the publication of a defamatory statement on a visual or sound radio broadcast, the defendant proves that said defamatory statement has been uttered by one other than the owner, licensee, or operator of the broadcasting station or one acting as the agent or employee of said owner, licensee or operator, the action shall be dismissed unless the plaintiff shall allege and prove that such owner, licensee, operator, agency or employee has failed to exercise due care to prevent the publication of said statement in said broadcast; provided, however, that bona fide compliance with any federal law or the regulation of any federal regulatory agency shall be construed as the exercise of due care; and provided, further, that in no event shall the owner, operator or licensee of a radio or television broadcasting station, or one acting as the agent or employee of such owner, operator or licensee, be held liable for the utterance of a defamatory statement in a visual or sound radio broadcast over the facilities of such station by any person speaking as a legally qualified candidate for public office, or on behalf of any such candidate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 43, § 1(2), effective May 18, 1956.

411.065.
Action for disseminating personally identifying information — Exemption of service providers.

Any person who violates KRS

525.085

shall be personally liable for actual and punitive damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees in a civil cause of action brought against an alleged perpetrator:

By a victim;

By a victim’s parent or legal guardian on behalf of a victim who is a minor; and

By a victim’s immediate family member or household member, if he or she is harmed as a result of the same violation against the victim.

The action may be filed in the Circuit Court for the county where the alleged violation occurred or the county where the victim resides.

An individual found liable under this section shall be jointly and severally liable with each other person found liable under this section for the damages arising from the same violation of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability on a broadband Internet access service provider, a telecommunications service provider, an interconnected VoIP provider, or a mobile service provider as defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 153

, a commercial mobile service provider as defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 332(d)

, or a cable operator as defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 522

, when acting in its capacity as a provider of those services.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 199, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

411.070.
Liability for falsely stating financial condition.

Any person who violates KRS

517.090

shall be personally liable to any person damaged by the violation for the amount of the damage. This section shall not release the principal for whom the person may have acted from any liability, but the person liable and the principal for whom he acted in violating this section shall be jointly and severally liable.

History.

1213b-2: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 406, § 314.

411.080.
Wrongful distress or attachment — Reparation.

If property is distrained or attached without good cause the owner may, in an action against the party suing out the distress or attachment, recover damages for the wrongful seizure. If the property is sold he may also recover damages for the sale, and the defendant’s costs in the distress or attachment, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The plaintiff shall not be required to allege or prove malice on the part of the defendant under this section.

History.

7.

411.090.
Liability of person gaming on premises without permission of owner.

If any person shall, in any house, boat, float or premises, without the permission of the owner, controller or occupier, engage in any hazard or game in which money or property is bet, won or lost, he shall be liable to the owner, controller or occupier for all damages and costs, legal and extraordinary, sustained in consequence thereof.

History.

1976.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Penalty for permitting gambling on premises, KRS

528.070

.

Permitting gambling, Penal Code, KRS

528.070

.

411.095.
Liability for stealing or damaging goods of retailer or wholesaler.

An adult or emancipated minor who damages, destroys, or takes possession of any goods, wares, or merchandise, stored, displayed, or offered for sale by any wholesale or retail store or other mercantile establishment, or who alters the price indicia of the merchandise, in violation of the provisions of KRS Chapters 512 and 514, without having paid the purchase price thereof, shall be civilly liable to the owner for actual damages, if any, and for a penalty to the owner in the amount of the retail value of the merchandise not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), plus an additional penalty to the owner of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

The custodial parents or legal guardian having custody of an unemancipated minor who damages, destroys, or takes possession of any goods, wares, or merchandise, stored, displayed, or offered for sale by any wholesale or retail store or other mercantile establishment, or who alters the price indicia of the merchandise, which would be a public offense, without having paid the purchase price thereof, shall be civilly liable to the owner for actual damages, if any, and for a penalty to the owner in the amount of the retail value of the merchandise not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), plus an additional penalty to the owner of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). For purposes of this subsection, liability shall not be imposed upon any governmental entity, private agency, or foster parents assigned responsibility for the minor child pursuant to a court order or action of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or any agency thereunder.

For the purposes of this section, “owner” shall include any agent or employee of the owner.

A conviction of an offense under KRS Chapters 512 or 514 is not a condition precedent to the maintenance of a civil action under this section.

Civil liability under this section shall not be limited by any other law that limits liability of parents of minor children.

An action for recovery of damages, or penalty, or both, and costs under this section may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction, including the small claims division of District Court, if the total amount sought does not exceed the jurisdictional limit of the respective court.

The fact that an owner has a right to bring an action against any individual as provided in this section shall not limit the right of the owner to demand, in writing, that a person who is liable under this section remit the amount of the claim prior to the commencement of any legal action.

Judgments, but not claims, arising under this section may be assigned.

In addition to any civil damages or penalties, or both, which may be recovered under this section, a judgment for recovery shall also include court costs.

Civil claims under this section shall apply to those claims which arise after July 13, 1990.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 162, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 598, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 646, effective June 20, 2005.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, 1991 Supp., Minors, § 30.16.

411.100.
Liability of city for property damaged by mob.

If, within any city, any church, convent, chapel, dwelling house, house used or designed for the transaction of lawful business, vessel or shipyard, railroad or property of any kind belonging to any street or other railroad company, or any article of personal property is damaged, or if any property is taken away or damaged by any riotous or tumultuous assemblage of people, the full amount of the damage done may be recovered by the person injured by action against the city, if the city authorities themselves, or with the aid of their own citizens, could have prevented the damage. However, no such liability shall be incurred by the city unless the city authorities had notice or good reason to believe that a riot or tumultuous assemblage was about to take place in time to prevent the destruction, either by their own force or by the aid of the citizens of the city. No person may maintain an action under this section if he has unlawfully contributed by word or deed toward exciting or inflaming the tumult or riot, or if he failed to do what he reasonably could toward preventing, allaying or suppressing it.

History.

8.

411.110.
Action against city for injury from defect in thoroughfare — Service of notice.

No action shall be maintained against any city in this state because of any injury growing out of any defect in the condition of any bridge, street, sidewalk, alley or other public thoroughfare, unless notice has been given to the mayor, city clerk or clerk of the board of aldermen in the manner provided for the service of notice in actions in the Rules of Civil Procedure. This notice shall be filed within ninety (90) days of the occurrence for which damage is claimed, stating the time of and place where the injury was received and the character and circumstances of the injury, and that the person injured will claim damages therefor from the city.

History.

2741e-24: amend Acts 1954, ch. 171.

411.115.
Notice of action against governmental unit for damages from use of airport required — Contents.

No action shall be brought against any governmental unit for damages, noise abatement or otherwise, arising from the operation of aircraft into or out of an airport unless written notice is given to such governmental unit within seven (7) days of the time within which each such operation occurred. Such notice shall state: (1) The location of the property affected; (2) The approximate time such operation occurred; and (3) If known, the type of aircraft and general direction of its flight.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 134, § 1.

411.120.
Action to quiet title; court order if title proved.

Any person having both the legal title and possession of land may prosecute suit, by petition in equity, in the circuit court of the county where the land or some part of it lies, against any other person setting up a claim to it. If the plaintiff establishes his title to the land the court shall order the defendant to release his claim to it and to pay the plaintiff his costs, unless the defendant by his answer disclaims all title to the land and offers to give such release to the plaintiff, in which case the plaintiff shall pay the defendant’s costs, unless for special reasons the court decrees otherwise respecting the costs.

History.

Recodified 1942 Ky. Acts ch. 208, sec. 1, effective October 1, 1942, from Ky. Stat. sec. 11.

411.130.
Action for wrongful death — Personal representative to prosecute — Distribution of amount recovered.

Whenever the death of a person results from an injury inflicted by the negligence or wrongful act of another, damages may be recovered for the death from the person who caused it, or whose agent or servant caused it. If the act was willful or the negligence gross, punitive damages may be recovered. The action shall be prosecuted by the personal representative of the deceased.

The amount recovered, less funeral expenses and the cost of administration and costs of recovery including attorney fees, not included in the recovery from the defendant, shall be for the benefit of and go to the kindred of the deceased in the following order:

If the deceased leaves a widow or husband, and no children or their descendants, then the whole to the widow or husband.

If the deceased leaves a widow and children or a husband and children, then one-half (1/2) to the widow or husband and the other one-half (1/2) to the children of the deceased.

If the deceased leaves a child or children, but no widow or husband, then the whole to the child or children.

If the deceased leaves no widow, husband or child, then the recovery shall pass to the mother and father of the deceased, one (1) moiety each, if both are living; if the mother is dead and the father is living, the whole thereof shall pass to the father; and if the father is dead and the mother living, the whole thereof shall go to the mother. In the event the deceased was an adopted person, “mother” and “father” shall mean the adoptive parents of the deceased.

If the deceased leaves no widow, husband or child, and if both father and mother are dead, then the whole of the recovery shall become a part of the personal estate of the deceased, and after the payment of his debts the remainder, if any, shall pass to his kindred more remote than those above named, according to the law of descent and distribution.

History.

6: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 89, § 1.

411.133.
Joinder of wrongful death and personal injury actions.

It shall be lawful for the personal representative of a decedent who was injured by reason of the tortious acts of another, and later dies from such injuries, to recover in the same action for both the wrongful death of the decedent and for the personal injuries from which the decedent suffered prior to death, including a recovery for all elements of damages in both a wrongful death action and a personal injury action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 30, § 1.

411.135.
Damages in action for wrongful death of minor.

In a wrongful death action in which the decedent was a minor child, the surviving parent, or parents, may recover for loss of affection and companionship that would have been derived from such child during its minority, in addition to all other elements of the damage usually recoverable in a wrongful death action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 30, § 2.

411.137.
Limitation on right to recover for wrongful death of child if parent has abandoned care and maintenance.

A parent who has willfully abandoned the care and maintenance of his or her child shall not have a right to maintain a wrongful death action for that child and shall not have a right otherwise to recover for the wrongful death of that child, unless:

The abandoning parent had resumed the care and maintenance at least one (1) year prior to the death of the child and had continued the care and maintenance until the child’s death; or

The parent had been deprived of the custody of his or her child under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction and the parent had substantially complied with all orders of the court requiring contribution to the support of the child.

This section may be cited as Mandy Jo’s Law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 414, §§ 2, 4, effective July 14, 2000.

411.140.
What action shall survive.

No right of action for personal injury or for injury to real or personal property shall cease or die with the person injuring or injured, except actions for slander, libel, criminal conversation, and so much of the action for malicious prosecution as is intended to recover for the personal injury. For any other injury an action may be brought or revived by the personal representative, or against the personal representative, heir or devisee, in the same manner as causes of action founded on contract.

History.

10: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 147.

411.145.
Damages for loss of consortium.

As used in this section “consortium” means the right to the services, assistance, aid, society, companionship and conjugal relationship between husband and wife, or wife and husband.

Either a wife or husband may recover damages against a third person for loss of consortium, resulting from a negligent or wrongful act of such third person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 200, § 1.

411.148.
Nonliability of licensees and certified technicians for emergency care.

No physician licensed under KRS Chapter 311, registered or practical nurse licensed under KRS Chapter 314, person certified as an emergency medical technician by the Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services, person certified by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation, or employee of any board of education established pursuant to the provision of KRS

160.160

, who has completed a course in first aid and who maintains current certification therein in accordance with the standards set forth by the American Red Cross shall be liable in civil damages for administering emergency care or treatment at the scene of an emergency outside of a hospital, doctor’s office, or other place having proper medical equipment excluding house calls, for acts performed at the scene of such emergency, unless such acts constitute willful or wanton misconduct.

Nothing in this section applies to the administering of such care or treatment where the same is rendered for remuneration or with the expectation of remuneration.

The administering of emergency care or treatment at the scene of an emergency by employees of a board of education shall not be considered to be rendered for remuneration or with the expectation of remuneration because such personnel perform such care as part of their regular professional or work responsibilities for which they receive their regular salaries from the school board which is their employer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 35, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107 (11); 1980, ch. 3, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 426, § 599, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 647, effective June 20, 2005.

411.150.
Action by surviving spouse or child of person killed with deadly weapon.

The surviving spouse and child, under the age of eighteen (18) or either of them, of a person killed by the careless, wanton or malicious use of a deadly weapon, not in self-defense, may have an action against the person who committed the killing and all others aiding or promoting, or any one (1) or more of them. In such actions the jury may give vindictive damages.

History.

4: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 100, § 21; 1974, ch. 386, § 97.

411.155.
Liability for damages resulting from criminal use of a firearm by another person.

A person or entity shall not be held liable for damages of any kind resulting from injuries to another person sustained as a result of the criminal use of any firearm by a third person, unless the person or entity conspired with the third person to commit, or willfully aided, abetted, or caused the commission of, the criminal act in which the firearm was used.

This section shall not be construed to negate, limit, or modify the doctrine of negligence or strict liability relating to abnormally dangerous products or activities and defective products.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 223, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

411.160.
Resolutions authorizing suit against Commonwealth not to be mentioned in trial of suit. [Repealed.]

411.165.
Liability of attorney for professional negligence.

If any attorney employed to attend to professional business neglects to attend to the business, after being paid anything for his services, or attends to the business negligently, he shall be liable to the client for all damages and costs sustained by reason thereof.

If any attorney employed to attend to any professional business receives his fee and does not attend to the business, he may be sued and made to refund the fee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 58, § 10.

411.167.
Certificate of merit for medical malpractice actions.

A claimant commencing any action identified in KRS 413.140(1)(e), or against a long-term-care facility as defined in KRS

216.510

alleging that the long-term-care facility failed to provide proper care to one (1) or more residents of the facility, shall file a certificate of merit with the complaint in the court in which the action is commenced.

“Certificate of merit” means an affidavit or declaration that:

The claimant has reviewed the facts of the case and has consulted with at least one (1) expert qualified pursuant to the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure and the Kentucky Rules of Evidence who is qualified to give expert testimony as to the standard of care or negligence and who the claimant or his or her counsel reasonably believes is knowledgeable in the relevant issues involved in the particular action, and has concluded on the basis of review and consultation that there is reasonable basis to commence the action;

The claimant was unable to obtain the consultation required by paragraph (a) of this subsection because a limitation of time established by KRS Chapter 413 would bar the action and that the consultation could not reasonably be obtained before that time expired. An affidavit or declaration executed pursuant to this paragraph shall be supplemented by an affidavit or declaration pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection or paragraph (c) of this subsection within sixty (60) days after service of the complaint or the suit shall be dismissed unless the court grants an extension for good cause; or

The claimant was unable to obtain the consultation required by paragraph (a) of this subsection because the claimant or his or her counsel had made at least three (3) separate good-faith attempts with three (3) different experts to obtain a consultation and that none of those contacted would agree to a consultation; so long as none of those contacted gave an opinion that there was no reasonable basis to commence the action.

A single certificate of merit is required for an action even if more than one (1) defendant has been named in the complaint or is subsequently named.

A certificate of merit is not required where the claimant intends to rely solely on one (1) or more causes of action for which expert testimony is not required, including claims of res ipsa loquitur and lack of informed consent, in which case the complaint shall be accompanied by an affidavit or declaration that no cause of action is asserted for which expert testimony is required.

If a request by the claimant for the records of the claimant’s medical treatment by the defendants has been made and the records have not been produced, the claimant shall not be required to file a certificate of merit under this section until ninety (90) days after the records have been produced. For purposes of this section, “records” includes but is not limited to paper or electronic copies of dictations, video recordings, fetal heart monitor strips, and imaging studies.

The identity and statements of an expert relied upon in subsection (2) of this section above are not discoverable, except:

When a claim is made under subsection (2)(c) of this section that the claimant was unable to obtain the required consultation with an expert, the court, upon the request of a defendant made prior to compliance by the claimant with this section, may require the claimant to divulge to the court, in camera and without disclosure by the court to any other party, the names of the physicians refusing to consult; or

If any party to an action hereto prevails on the basis of the failure of an opposing party to offer any competent expert testimony, the court may, upon motion, for good cause shown compel the opposing party or party’s counsel to provide to the court the name of any expert consulted and any written materials relied upon in executing the certificate.

The claimant, in lieu of serving a certificate of merit, may provide the defendant or defendants with expert information in the form required by the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure. Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of any “consulting” or nontrial expert, except as expressly stated in this section.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 180, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

411.170.
Action on lost, destroyed, mutilated or defaced writing.

An ordinary or equitable action may be brought upon a bill of exchange, or a note or other obligation, or upon an indorsement or assignment thereof, which, or upon a judgment the record of which, is lost, destroyed, mutilated, or defaced, without fraud on the part of the plaintiff, or of those under whom he claims. But no action shall be brought upon an instrument transferable by delivery, merely, which is alleged to be lost, destroyed, mutilated, or defaced, without a previous tender by the plaintiff to the defendant, if his name and place of residence be known to the plaintiff, of an indemnifying bond, with good surety, nor shall judgment be given against the defendant, in such action, until such bond is given, with good surety approved by the court.

History.

C. C. 7: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

411.180.
Actions against joint obligors — Death of joint obligors — Effect of judgment against some.

If two (2) or more persons be jointly bound by contract, the action thereon may be brought against all or any of them, at the plaintiff’s option. If any of the persons so bound be dead, the action may be brought against any or all of the survivors with the representatives of all or any of the decedents, or against the latter or any of them. If all the persons so bound be dead, the action may be brought against the representatives of all or any of them. An action or judgment against any one (1) or more of several persons jointly bound shall not be a bar to proceedings against the others.

History.

C. C. 27: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

411.182.
Allocation of fault in tort actions — Award of damages — Effect of release.

In all tort actions, including products liability actions, involving fault of more than one (1) party to the action, including third-party defendants and persons who have been released under subsection (4) of this section, the court, unless otherwise agreed by all parties, shall instruct the jury to answer interrogatories or, if there is no jury, shall make findings indicating:

The amount of damages each claimant would be entitled to recover if contributory fault is disregarded; and

The percentage of the total fault of all the parties to each claim that is allocated to each claimant, defendant, third-party defendant, and person who has been released from liability under subsection (4) of this section.

In determining the percentages of fault, the trier of fact shall consider both the nature of the conduct of each party at fault and the extent of the causal relation between the conduct and the damages claimed.

The court shall determine the award of damages to each claimant in accordance with the findings, subject to any reduction under subsection (4) of this section, and shall determine and state in the judgment each party’s equitable share of the obligation to each claimant in accordance with the respective percentages of fault.

A release, covenant not to sue, or similar agreement entered into by a claimant and a person liable, shall discharge that person from all liability for contribution, but it shall not be considered to discharge any other persons liable upon the same claim unless it so provides. However, the claim of the releasing person against other persons shall be reduced by the amount of the released persons’ equitable share of the obligation, determined in accordance with the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 224, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

411.184.
Definitions — Punitive damages — Proof of punitive damages.

As used in this section and KRS

411.186

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Oppression” means conduct which is specifically intended by the defendant to subject the plaintiff to cruel and unjust hardship.

“Fraud” means an intentional misrepresentation, deceit, or concealment of material fact known to the defendant and made with the intention of causing injury to the plaintiff.

“Malice” means either conduct which is specifically intended by the defendant to cause tangible or intangible injury to the plaintiff or conduct that is carried out by the defendant both with a flagrant indifference to the rights of the plaintiff and with a subjective awareness that such conduct will result in human death or bodily harm.

“Plaintiff” means any party claiming punitive damages.

“Defendant” means any party against whom punitive damages are sought.

“Punitive damages” includes exemplary damages and means damages, other than compensatory and nominal damages, awarded against a person to punish and to discourage him and others from similar conduct in the future.

A plaintiff shall recover punitive damages only upon proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that the defendant from whom such damages are sought acted toward the plaintiff with oppression, fraud or malice.

In no case shall punitive damages be assessed against a principal or employer for the act of an agent or employee unless such principal or employer authorized or ratified or should have anticipated the conduct in question.

In no case shall punitive damages be awarded for breach of contract.

This statute is applicable to all cases in which punitive damages are sought and supersedes any and all existing statutory or judicial law insofar as such law is inconsistent with the provisions of this statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 224, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.